Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1237
Publicly financed projects; planning requirements.

Publicly financed projects shall be planned in a manner that (1) recognizes, at an early stage in the planning of such project and before the commencement of any action which will cause displacements, the problems associated with the displacement of individuals, families, businesses, and farm operations and (2) provides for the resolution of such problems in order to minimize adverse impacts on displaced persons and to expedite project advancement and completion.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 24.